ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 금관악기 부대용품: 금관악기 관리/청소 용품; 금관악기 케이스/패딩 가방; 금관악기 마우스피스; 금관악기 뮤트; 금관악기 교체 부품; 금관악기 스트랩/스탠드
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za trobila: Nega in čiščenje trobil; Kovčki in torbe za trobila; Ustniki za trobila; Dušilci za trobila; Nadomestni deli za trobila; Oporniki in stojala za trobila
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor koperen blaasinstrumenten: Onderhoud en reiniging van koperen blaasinstrumenten; Koffers en gigbags voor koperen blaasinstrumenten; Mondstukken voor koperen blaasinstrumenten; Dempers voor koperen blaasinstrumenten; Vervangende onderdelen voor koperen blaasinstrumenten; Riemen en standaarden voor koperen blaasinstrumenten
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai: Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priežiūra ir valymas; Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų dėklai; Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų pūstukai; Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų surdinos; Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų atsarginės dalys; Varinių instrumentų diržai ir stovai
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour cuivres: Entretien et nettoyage des cuivres; Étuis et housses pour cuivres; Embouchures pour cuivres; Sourdines pour cuivres; Pièces de rechange pour cuivres; Sangles et supports pour cuivres
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente din alamă: Îngrijirea și curățarea instrumentelor din alamă; Cutii și genți pentru instrumente din alamă; Muștiucuri pentru instrumente din alamă; Surdine pentru instrumente din alamă; Piese de schimb pentru instrumente din alamă; Curele și stative pentru instrumente din alamă
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Žesťové nástroje – příslušenství: Údržba a čištění žesťových nástrojů; Pouzdra a koncertní tašky k žesťovým nástrojům; Náustky k žesťovým nástrojům; Dusítka k žesťovým nástrojům; Náhradní díly k žesťovým nástrojům; Popruhy a stojany k žesťovým nástrojům
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre dychové nástroje: Starostlivosť a čistenie dychových nástrojov; Puzdrá a tašky na dychové nástroje; Nátrubky pre dychové nástroje; Dusítka dychových nástrojov; Náhradné diely pre dychové nástroje; Popruhy a stojany na dychové nástroje
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 铜管乐器配件: 铜管乐器清洁保养; 铜管乐器盒/包; 铜管乐器吹口; 铜管乐器弱音器; 铜管乐器备件; 铜管乐器背带与支架
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Vaskipuhallintarvikkeet: Vaskipuhaltimien hoito ja puhdistus; Vaskipuhaltimien kotelot ja laukut; Vaskipuhaltimien suukappaleet; Vaskipuhaltimien sordiinot; Vaskipuhaltimien varaosat; Vaskipuhaltimien hihnat ja telineet
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων: Φροντίδα & καθαρισμός χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων; Θήκες & μαλακές θήκες για χάλκινα πνευστά όργανα; Επιστόμια χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων; Σιγαστήρες χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων; Ανταλλακτικά χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων; Ιμάντες & βάσεις χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Messingblæser – tilbehør: Messingblæser – pleje og rengøring; Etuier og tasker til messingblæsere; Mundstykker til messingblæsere; Dæmpere til messingblæsere; Messingblæser – reservedele; Remme og stativer til messingblæsere
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Rézfúvóshangszer-kiegészítő: Rézfúvóshangszer-ápolás és -tisztítás; Rézfúvóshangszer-tokok és -táskák; Rézfúvóshangszer-fúvókák; Rézfúvóshangszer-némítók; Rézfúvóshangszer-cserealkatrészek; Rézfúvóshangszer-pántok és -állványok
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 銅管樂器配件: 銅管樂器清潔保養品; 銅管樂器盒/袋; 銅管樂器吹嘴; 銅管樂器弱音器; 銅管樂器替換零件; 銅管樂器繫帶/腳架
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de sopro: Limpeza e cuidado de instrumentos de sopro; Sacos e estojos para instrumentos de sopro; Boquilhas de instrumentos de sopro; Surdinas de instrumentos de sopro; Peças de substituição de instrumentos de sopro; Alças e suportes de instrumentos de sopro
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per ottoni: Cura e pulitura ottoni; Custodie e borse da concerto per ottoni; Imboccature per ottoni; Sordine per ottoni; Pezzi di ricambio ottoni; Tracolle e supporti per ottoni
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til messinginstrumenter: Pleie og rengjøring av messinginstrumenter; Kasser og vesker for messinginstrumenter; Munnstykker for messinginstrumenter; Muter til messinginstrumenter; Reservedeler til messinginstrumenter; Stropper og stativer til messinginstrumenter
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за духови инструменти: Грижа и почистване на духови инструменти; Чанти и куфари за духови инструменти; Мундщуци за духови инструменти; Сурдини за духови инструменти; Резервни части за духови инструменти; Каишки и стойки за духови инструменти
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Brass Instrument Accessories: Brass Instrument Care & Cleaning; Brass Instrument Cases & Gigbags; Brass Instrument Mouthpieces; Brass Instrument Mutes; Brass Instrument Replacement Parts; Brass Instrument Straps & Stands
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych blaszanych: Elementy konserwujące i czyszczące do instrumentów dętych blaszanych; Futerały i torby na instrumenty dęte blaszane; Ustniki do instrumentów dętych blaszanych; Tłumiki do instrumentów dętych blaszanych; Części zamienne do instrumentów dętych blaszanych; Paski i stojaki do instrumentów dętych blaszanych
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de metal: Manutenção e limpeza de instrumentos de sopro de metal; Estojos para instrumentos de sopro de metal; Bocais para instrumentos de sopro de metal; Surdinas para instrumentos de sopro de metal; Peças de reposição para instrumentos de sopro de metal; Suportes e alças para instrumentos de sopro de metal
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 金管楽器用品: 金管楽器お手入れ用品; 金管楽器用ケース・ギグバッグ; 金管楽器用マウスピース; 金管楽器用ミュート; 金管楽器用交換パーツ; 金管楽器用ストラップ・スタンド
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: การดูแลและทำความสะอาดเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง; ที่ใส่และกระเป๋าเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง; ส่วนปากเป่าสำหรับเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง; ที่ลดเสียงสำหรับเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง; ชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่เครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง; สายสะพายและที่ตั้งเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для медных духовых инструментов: Чистка медных духовых инструментов и уход за ними; Футляры и чехлы для медных духовых инструментов; Мундштуки для медных духовых инструментов; Сурдины для медных духовых инструментов; Запчасти для медных духовых инструментов; Ремни и подставки для медных духовых инструментов
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện kèn đồng: Sản phẩm vệ sinh và chăm sóc kèn đồng; Hộp & túi đựng nhạc cụ bằng đồng; Miệng kèn đồng; Thiết bị chặn tiếng dùng cho kèn đồng; Phụ tùng kèn đồng thay thế; Dây đeo & khóa nhạc cụ bằng đồng
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za limena puhaća glazbala: Održavanje i čišćenje limenih puhaćih glazbala; Koferi i torbe za limena puhaća glazbala; Usnici za limena puhaća glazbala; Sordine za limena puhaća glazbala; Zamjenski dijelovi za limena puhaća glazbala; Remeni i stalci za limena puhaća glazbala
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till bleckblåsinstrument: Vård och rengöring av bleckblåsinstrument; Fodral och väskor för bleckblåsinstrument; Munstycken till bleckblåsinstrument; Sordiner för bleckblåsinstrument; Ersättningsdelar till bleckblåsinstrument; Axelband och stativ till bleckblåsinstrument
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları: Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Bakım ve Temizliği; Üflemeli Çalgı Kılıfları ve Çantaları; Üflemeli Çalgı Ağızlıkları; Üflemeli Çalgı Susturucuları; Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Yedek Parçaları; Üflemeli Çalgı Kayışları ve Standları
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de metal: Limpieza y cuidado de instrumentos de metal; Fundas y estuches para instrumentos de metal; Boquillas para instrumentos de metal; Sordinas para instrumentos de metal; Piezas de repuesto de instrumentos de metal; Bases y correas para instrumentos de metal
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Blechblasinstrumente: Blechblasinstrumentenpflege &-reinigung; Koffer & Gigbags für Blechinstrumente; Mundstücke für Blechinstrumente; Dämpfer für Blechinstrumente; Ersatzteile für Blechblasinstrumente; Aufhängungen & Ständer für Blechinstrumente